Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1202
County attorney; actions before magistrate; duties.

Each county attorney shall appear on behalf of the state before any magistrate, and prosecute all complaints made in behalf of the state of which any magistrate shall have jurisdiction, and he shall appear before any magistrate and conduct any criminal examination which may be had before such magistrate, and shall also prosecute all civil suits before such magistrate in which the state or county is a party or interested.

Laws 1885, c. 40, § 3, p. 216;

R.S.1913, § 5597;

C.S.1922, § 4914;

C.S.1929, § 26-902;

R.S.1943, § 23-1202.

It is not the duty of the county attorney to appear and prosecute violator of village ordinance, where prosecution is not based upon violation of state law. State ex rel. Vannatter v. McDonald, 100 Neb. 332, 160 N.W. 95 (1916).

County attorney has full control of action. Rickley v. State, 65 Neb. 841, 91 N.W. 867 (1902).